Maryland, session 2026, HB0841.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0841*

HOUSE BILL 841
Article – Real Property
11–108.
(c) (1) This subsection does not apply to any meetings of unit owners occurring
at any time before the unit owners elect officers or a board of directors in accordance with
[§ 11–109(c)(16)] § 11–109(C)(18) of this title.
11–109.
(a) (1) The affairs of the condominium shall be governed by a council of unit
owners which, even if unincorporated, is constituted a legal entity for all purposes.
(2) The council of unit owners shall [be comprised of] COMPRISE all unit
owners.
(b) The bylaws may authorize or provide for the delegation of any power of the
council of unit owners to a board of directors, officers, managing agent, or other person for
the purpose of carrying out the responsibilities of the council of unit owners.
(c) (1) A meeting of the council of unit owners or board of directors may not be
held on less notice than required by this section.
(2) The council of unit owners shall maintain a current roster of names and
addresses of each unit owner to which notice of meetings of the board of directors shall be
sent at least annually.
(3) Each unit owner shall furnish the council of unit owners with his name
and current mailing address. A unit owner may not vote at meetings of the council of unit
owners until this information is furnished.
(4) A regular or special meeting of the council of unit owners may not be
held on less than 10 nor more than 90 days’:
(i) Written notice delivered or mailed to each unit owner at the
address shown on the roster on the date of the notice; or
(ii) Notice sent to each unit owner by electronic transmission, if the
requirements of § 11–139.1 of this title are met.
(5) Notice of special meetings of the board of directors shall be given:
(i) As provided in the bylaws; or
(ii) If the requirements of § 11–139.1 of this title are met, by
electronic transmission.

HOUSE BILL 841 3
(6) Except as provided in § 11–109.1 of this title, a meeting of a governing
body shall be open and held at a time and location as provided in the notice or bylaws.
(7) (i) This paragraph does not apply to any meeting of the governing
body that occurs at any time before the meeting at which the unit owners elect officers or a
board of directors in accordance with paragraph [(16)] (18) of this subsection.
(ii) Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph and to reasonable
rules adopted by the governing body under § 11–111 of this title, a governing body shall
provide a designated period of time during [a] EACH meeting to allow unit owners an
opportunity to comment on any matter relating to the condominium.
(iii) During a meeting at which the agenda is limited to specific topics
or at a special meeting, the unit owners’ comments may be limited to the topics listed on
the meeting agenda.
(iv) The governing body shall convene at least one meeting each year
at which [the]:
1. THE agenda is open to any matter relating to the
condominium; AND
2. THE UNIT OWNERS HAVE AN OPPORTUNITY TO
PROVIDE COMMENT.
(8) UNTIL A MEETING IS HELD IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH
(18) OF THIS SUBSECTION AT WHICH THE UNIT OWNERS ELECT OFFICERS OR A
BOARD OF DIRECTORS, THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR THE DEVELOPER SHALL
CONVENE AT LEAST ONE MEETING EACH YEAR AT WHICH:
(I) THE AGENDA IS OPEN TO ANY MATTER RELATING TO THE
CONDOMINIUM; AND
(II) THE UNIT OWNERS HAVE AN OPPORTUNITY TO PROVIDE
COMMENT.
[(8)] (9) (i) Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a quorum is deemed
present throughout any meeting of the council of unit owners if persons entitled to cast 25
percent of the total number of votes appurtenant to all units are present in person or by
proxy.
(ii) If the number of persons present in person or by proxy at a
properly called meeting of the council of unit owners is insufficient to constitute a quorum,
an additional meeting of the council of unit owners may be called for the same purpose if:

HOUSE BILL 841
1. The notice of the initial properly called meeting stated:
A. That the procedure authorized by this paragraph might be
invoked; and
B. The date, time, and place of the additional meeting; and
2. A majority of the unit owners present vote in person or by
proxy to call for the additional meeting.
(iii) 1. An additional meeting called under subparagraph (ii) of
this paragraph shall occur not less than 15 days after the initial properly called meeting.
2. Not less than 10 days before the additional meeting, a
separate and distinct notice of the date, time, place, and purpose of the additional meeting
called under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph shall be:
A. Delivered, mailed, or sent by electronic transmission if the
requirements of § 11–139.1 of this title are met, to each unit owner at the address shown
on the roster maintained under paragraph (2) of this subsection;
B. Advertised in a newspaper published in the county where
the condominium is located; or
C. If the condominium has a website, posted on the homepage
of the website.
3. The notice shall contain the quorum and voting provisions
of subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph.
(iv) 1. At the additional meeting, the unit owners present in
person or by proxy constitute a quorum.
2. Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a majority of the
unit owners present in person or by proxy:
A. May approve or authorize the proposed action at the
additional meeting; and
B. May take any other action that could have been taken at
the original meeting if a sufficient number of unit owners had been present.
(v) This paragraph may not be construed to affect the percentage of
votes required to amend the declaration or bylaws or to take any other action required to
be taken by a specified percentage of votes.

HOUSE BILL 841 5
[(9)] (10) At meetings of the council of unit owners each unit owner shall
be entitled to cast the number of votes appurtenant to his unit. Unit owners may vote by
proxy, but the proxy is effective only for a maximum period of 180 days following its
issuance, unless granted to a lessee or mortgagee.
[(10)] (11) Any proxy may be revoked at any time at the pleasure of the unit
owner or unit owners executing the proxy.
[(11)] (12) A proxy who is not appointed to vote as directed by a unit owner
may only be appointed for purposes of meeting quorums and to vote for matters of business
before the council of unit owners, other than an election of officers and members of the
board of directors.
[(12)] (13) Only a unit owner voting in person or by electronic transmission
if the requirements of § 11–139.2 of this title are met or a proxy voting for candidates
designated by a unit owner may vote for officers and members of the board of directors.
[(13)] (14) Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, a unit owner may
nominate himself or any other person to be an officer or member of the board of directors.
A call for nominations shall be sent to all unit owners not less than 45 days before notice of
an election is sent. Only nominations made at least 15 days before notice of an election shall
be listed on the election ballot. Candidates shall be listed on the ballot in alphabetical order,
with no indicated candidate preference. Nominations may be made from the floor at the
meeting at which the election to the board is held.
[(14)] (15) Election materials prepared with funds of the council of unit
owners shall list candidates in alphabetical order and may not indicate a candidate
preference.
[(15)] (16) Unless otherwise provided in this title, and subject to provisions
in the bylaws requiring a different majority, decisions of the council of unit owners shall be
made on a majority of votes of the unit owners listed on the current roster present and
voting.
(17) (I) IF THERE IS A BOARD OF DIRECTORS FOR THE COUNCIL OF
UNIT OWNERS ALREADY ESTABLISHED BY THE DEVELOPER, WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER
THE DATE ON WHICH UNITS REPRESENTING 25 PERCENT OF THE VOTES IN THE
CONDOMINIUM HAVE BEEN CONVEYED BY THE DEVELOPER TO MEMBERS OF THE
PUBLIC FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES, THE DEVELOPER SHALL APPOINT AT LEAST
ONE MEMBER TO THAT BOARD OF DIRECTORS WHO IS:
1. A UNIT OWNER; AND
2. NOT OTHERWISE AFFILIATED WITH THE DEVELOPER.

HOUSE BILL 841
(II) IF NO BOARD OF DIRECTORS FOR THE COUNCIL OF UNIT
OWNERS HAS BEEN ESTABLISHED BY THE DEVELOPER WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE
DATE ON WHICH UNITS REPRESENTING 25 PERCENT OF THE VOTES IN THE
CONDOMINIUM HAVE BEEN CONVEYED BY THE DEVELOPER TO MEMBERS OF THE
PUBLIC FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES, THE DEVELOPER SHALL ESTABLISH A BOARD
OF DIRECTORS FOR THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS AND SHALL APPOINT AT LEAST
ONE MEMBER TO THAT BOARD OF DIRECTORS WHO IS:
1. A UNIT OWNER; AND
2. NOT OTHERWISE AFFILIATED WITH THE DEVELOPER.
(III) THE DETERMINATION OF WHEN UNITS REPRESENTING 25
PERCENT OF THE VOTES IN AN EXPANDABLE CONDOMINIUM SUBJECT TO § 11–120
OF THIS TITLE HAVE BEEN CONVEYED BY THE DEVELOPER TO MEMBERS OF THE
PUBLIC FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES SHALL BE BASED ON THE TOTAL NUMBER OF
UNITS THAT MAY BE SUBJECT TO THE DECLARATION ON FULL EXPANSION OF THE
CONDOMINIUM, AS IDENTIFIED IN THE DECLARATION.
[(16)] (18) (i) A meeting of the council of unit owners to elect a board of
directors for the council of unit owners, as provided in the condominium declaration or
bylaws, shall be held within:
1. 60 days from the date that units representing 50 percent
of the votes in the condominium have been conveyed by the developer to members of the
public for residential purposes; or
2. If a lesser percentage is specified in the declaration or
bylaws of the condominium, 60 days from the date the specified lesser percentage of units
in the condominium are sold to members of the public for residential purposes.
(ii) 1. Before the date of the meeting held under subparagraph
(i) of this paragraph, the developer shall deliver to each unit owner notice that the
requirements of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph have been met.
2. The notice shall include the date, time, and place of the
meeting to elect the board of directors for the council of unit owners.
(iii) If a replacement board member is elected, the term of each
member of the board of directors appointed by the developer shall end 10 days after the
meeting is held as specified in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(iv) Within 30 days from the date of the meeting held under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the developer shall deliver to the officers or board of
directors for the council of unit owners, as provided in the condominium declaration or
bylaws, at the developer’s expense:

HOUSE BILL 841 7
1. The documents specified in § 11–132 of this title;
2. The condominium funds, including operating funds,
replacement reserves, investment accounts, and working capital;
3. The tangible property of the condominium; and
4. A roster of current unit owners, including mailing
addresses, telephone numbers, and unit numbers, if known.
(v) The replacement reserves delivered under subparagraph (iv)2 of
this paragraph for a residential condominium shall be equal to at least the reserve funding
amount recommended in the reserve study completed under § 11–109.4 of this title as of
the date of the meeting.
(vi) 1. This subparagraph does not apply to a contract entered
into before October 1, 2009.
2. A. In this subparagraph, “contract” means an
agreement with a company or individual to handle financial matters, maintenance, or
services for the condominium.
B. “Contract” does not include an agreement relating to the
provision of utility services or communication systems.
3. Until all members of the board of directors of the
condominium are elected by the unit owners at a transitional meeting as specified in
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, a contract entered into by the officers or board of
directors of the condominium may be terminated, at the discretion of the board of directors
and without liability for the termination, not later than 30 days after notice.
(vii) If the developer fails to comply with the requirements of this
paragraph, an aggrieved unit owner may submit the dispute to the Division of Consumer
Protection of the Office of the Attorney General under § 11–130(c) of this title.
[(17)] (19) (i) Elections, including the collection and counting of ballots
and the certifying of results, for officers or members of the governing body other than the
full membership of the council of unit owners shall be conducted by independent parties
who:
1. Are not candidates in the election; and
2. Do not have a conflict of interest regarding any candidate
in the election.
(ii) A unit owner is an independent party if the unit owner:

HOUSE BILL 841
1. Complies with the requirements of this section;
2. Does not electioneer for any candidate; and
3. Is not subject to an objection by more than 25 percent of
the eligible voting members of the council of unit owners.
(iii) Unless property management for a condominium is owned by the
condominium, or a parent association of the condominium, representatives of the
condominium’s property management are not independent parties.
[(18)] (20) The governing body may retain a third–party vendor or employ
a commercial technology platform to conduct an election.
[(19)] (21) Individuals conducting an election shall make reasonable efforts
to ensure that the election is fair and that there is accountability for the process and the
results of the election.
[(20)] (22) A unit owner designated to conduct an election who acts in good
faith is not personally liable in connection with the conduct of the election.
[(21)] (23) (i) The governing body shall make reasonable
accommodations, including reasonable use of any portion of common areas, for unit owners
to engage in organizing activities relating to governance of the condominium.
(ii) The governing body may not prevent unit owners from or
retaliate against unit owners for exercising rights guaranteed under law or under the
governing documents of the condominium.
[(22)] (24) Provisions of the governing documents, rules, or regulations of a
condominium relating to the conduct of elections that are inconsistent with the
requirements of this section are unenforceable and void.
11–109.4.
(c) (2) The governing body of the condominium shall have an independent
reserve study completed not less than 30 calendar days before the meeting of the council of
unit owners required under [§ 11–109(c)(16)] § 11–109(C)(18) of this title.
11–114.1.
(d) A copy of the fidelity insurance policy or fidelity bond shall be included in the
books and records kept and made available by the council of unit owners under § 11–116 of
this title.

HOUSE BILL 841 9
11–116.
(a) The council of unit owners shall keep books and records BEGINNING ON THE
DATE THE COUNCIL OF UNIT OWNERS IS ESTABLISHED in accordance with good
accounting practices on a consistent basis.
(b) On the request of the unit owners of at least 5 percent of the units, the council
of unit owners shall cause an audit of the books and records to be made by an independent
certified public accountant, provided an audit shall be made not more than once in any
consecutive 12–month period. The cost of the audit shall be a common expense.
(c) (1) (i) 1. Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, all
books and records, including insurance policies, kept by the council of unit owners shall be
maintained in Maryland or within 50 miles of its borders and shall be available at some
place designated by the council of unit owners for examination or copying, or both, by any
unit owner, a unit owner’s mortgagee, or their respective duly authorized agents or
attorneys, during normal business hours, and after reasonable notice.
2. ALL BOOKS AND RECORDS KEPT BY THE COUNCIL OF
UNIT OWNERS SHALL BE MAINTAINED SEPARATE AND APART FROM THE BOOKS AND
RECORDS OF THE DEVELOPER OR OF ANY OTHER PERSON.
(ii) If a unit owner requests in writing a copy of financial statements
of the condominium or the minutes of a meeting of the board of directors or other governing
body of the condominium to be delivered, the board of directors or other governing body of
the condominium shall compile and send the requested information by mail, electronic
transmission, or personal delivery:
1. Within 21 days after receipt of the written request, if the
financial statements or minutes were prepared within the 3 years immediately preceding
receipt of the request; or
2. Within 45 days after receipt of the written request, if the
financial statements or minutes were prepared more than 3 years before receipt of the
request.
(2) Books and records required to be made available under paragraph (1)
of this subsection shall first be made available to a unit owner not later than 15 business
days after a unit is conveyed from a developer and the unit owner requests to examine or
copy the books and records.
(3) Books and records kept by or on behalf of a council of unit owners may
be withheld from public inspection, except for inspection by the person who is the subject
of the record or the person’s designee or guardian, to the extent that they concern:

HOUSE BILL 841
(i) Personnel records, not including information on individual
salaries, wages, bonuses, and other compensation paid to employees;
(ii) An individual’s medical records;
(iii) An individual’s personal financial records, including assets,
income, liabilities, net worth, bank balances, financial history or activities, and
creditworthiness;
(iv) Records relating to business transactions that are currently in
negotiation;
(v) The written advice of legal counsel; or
(vi) Minutes of a closed meeting of the board of directors or other
governing body of the council of unit owners, unless a majority of a quorum of the board of
directors or governing body that held the meeting approves unsealing the minutes or a
recording of the minutes for public inspection.
(d) (1) (i) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the council of
unit owners may impose a reasonable charge on a person desiring to review or copy the
books and records of the condominium or who requests delivery of information.
(ii) The council of unit owners may not impose any charges under
this section other than those authorized under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(2) A unit owner may not be charged for:
(i) Examining the financial statements of the condominium in
person where the financial statements are maintained in accordance with subsection
(c)(1)(i) of this section; or
(ii) Receiving the financial statements of the condominium through
electronic transmission in accordance with subsection (c)(1)(ii) of this section.
(3) A charge imposed under paragraph (1) of this subsection for copying
books and records may not exceed the limits authorized under Title 7, Subtitle 2 of the
Courts Article.
11–132.
On transfer of control by the developer to the council of unit owners, the developer
shall turn over documents including:
(1) Copies of the condominium’s filed articles of incorporation, recorded
declaration, and all recorded covenants, bylaws, plats, and restrictions of the condominium;

HOUSE BILL 841 11
(2) Subject to the restrictions of § 11–116 of this title, all books and records
of the condominium, including financial statements, minutes of any meeting of the
governing body, and completed business transactions;
(3) Any policies, rules, and regulations adopted by the governing body;
(4) The financial records of the condominium from the date of creation to
the date of transfer of control, including budget information regarding estimated and actual
expenditures by the condominium and any report relating to the reserves required for major
repairs and replacement of the common elements of the condominium;
(5) A copy of all contracts to which the condominium is a party;
(6) The name, address, and telephone number of any contractor or
subcontractor employed by the condominium;
(7) Any insurance policies in effect and all prior insurance policies;
(8) Any permit or notice of code violation issued to the condominium by the
county, local, State, or federal government;
(9) Any warranty in effect;
(10) Drawings, architectural plans, or other suitable documents setting
forth the necessary information for location, maintenance, and repair of all condominium
facilities; and
(11) Individual owner files and records, including assessment account
records, correspondence, and notices of any violations.
11B–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated, unless the
context requires otherwise.
(c) “Declarant” means any person who subjects property to a declaration.
(d) (1) “Declaration” means an instrument, however denominated, recorded
among the land records of the county in which the property of the declarant is located, that
creates the authority for a homeowners association to impose on lots, or on the owners or
occupants of lots, or on another homeowners association, condominium, or cooperative
housing corporation any mandatory fee in connection with the provision of services or
otherwise for the benefit of some or all of the lots, the owners or occupants of lots, or the
common areas.
(2) “Declaration” includes any amendment or supplement to the
instruments described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.

HOUSE BILL 841
(3) “Declaration” does not include a private right–of–way or similar
agreement unless it requires a mandatory fee payable annually or at more frequent
intervals.
11B–106.1.
(A) (1) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBSECTION APPLY TO A
DEVELOPMENT THAT CONTAINS MORE THAN 12 LOTS.
(2) IF THERE IS A BOARD OF DIRECTORS FOR THE HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION ALREADY ESTABLISHED BY THE DECLARANT, WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER
THE DATE THAT 25% OF THE MAXIMUM NUMBER OF LOTS CURRENTLY PLANNED OR
PERMITTED TO BE CONTAINED WITHIN THE DEVELOPMENT HAVE BEEN CONVEYED
TO MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES, THE DECLARANT SHALL
APPOINT AT LEAST ONE MEMBER TO THAT BOARD OF DIRECTORS WHO IS:
(I) A LOT OWNER; AND
(II) NOT OTHERWISE AFFILIATED WITH THE DECLARANT OR A
VENDOR OF LOTS IN THE DEVELOPMENT.
(3) IF NO BOARD OF DIRECTORS FOR THE HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION HAS BEEN ESTABLISHED BY THE DECLARANT WHEN 25% OF THE
MAXIMUM NUMBER OF LOTS CURRENTLY PLANNED OR PERMITTED TO BE
CONTAINED WITHIN THE DEVELOPMENT HAVE BEEN CONVEYED TO MEMBERS OF
THE PUBLIC FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES, THE DECLARANT SHALL ESTABLISH A
BOARD OF DIRECTORS AND SHALL APPOINT AT LEAST ONE MEMBER TO THAT BOARD
OF DIRECTORS WHO IS:
(I) A LOT OWNER; AND
(II) NOT OTHERWISE AFFILIATED WITH THE DECLARANT OR A
VENDOR OF LOTS IN THE DEVELOPMENT.
(4) THE DETERMINATION OF WHEN 25% OF THE MAXIMUM NUMBER
OF LOTS CURRENTLY PLANNED OR PERMITTED TO BE CONTAINED WITHIN THE
DEVELOPMENT HAVE BEEN CONVEYED TO MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC FOR
RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES SHALL BE BASED ON THE INFORMATION SUPPLIED BY THE
VENDOR UNDER § 11B–105(B)(3)(I) OF THIS TITLE.
[(a)] (B) A meeting of the members of the homeowners association to elect a
governing body of the homeowners association shall be held within:

HOUSE BILL 841 13
(1) 60 days from the date that at least 75% of the total number of lots that
may be part of the development after all phases are complete are sold to members of the
public for residential purposes; or
(2) If a lesser percentage is specified in the governing documents of the
homeowners association, 60 days from the date the specified lesser percentage of the total
number of lots in the development after all phases are complete are sold to members of the
public for residential purposes.
[(b)] (C) (1) Before the date of the meeting held under subsection [(a)] (B) of
this section, the declarant shall deliver to each lot owner notice that the requirements of
subsection [(a)] (B) of this section have been met.
(2) The notice shall include the date, time, and place of the meeting to elect
the governing body of the homeowners association.
[(c)] (D) The term of each member of the governing body of the homeowners
association appointed by the declarant shall end 10 days after the meeting under subsection
[(a)] (B) of this section is held, if a replacement board member is elected.
[(d)] (E) Within 30 days from the date of the meeting held under subsection [(a)]
(B) of this section, the declarant shall deliver the following items to the governing body at
the declarant’s expense:
(1) The deeds to the common areas;
(2) Copies of the homeowners association’s filed articles of incorporation,
declaration, and all recorded covenants, plats, restrictions, and any other records of the
primary development and of related developments;
(3) A copy of the bylaws and rules of the primary development and of other
related developments as filed in the depository of the county in which the development is
located;
(4) The minute books, including all minutes;
(5) Subject to the restrictions of § 11B–112 of this title, all books and
records of the homeowners association, including financial statements, minutes of any
meeting of the governing body, and completed business transactions;
(6) Any policies, rules, and regulations adopted by the governing body;
(7) The financial records of the homeowners association from the date of
creation to the date of transfer of control, including budget information regarding estimated
and actual expenditures by the homeowners association and any report relating to the

HOUSE BILL 841
reserves required for major repairs and replacement of the common areas of the
homeowners association;
(8) A copy of all contracts to which the homeowners association is a party;
(9) The name, address, and telephone number of any contractor or
subcontractor employed by the homeowners association;
(10) Any insurance policies in effect;
(11) Any permit or notice of code violations issued to the homeowners
association by the county, local, State, or federal government;
(12) Any warranty in effect and all prior insurance policies;
(13) The homeowners association funds, including operating funds,
replacement reserves, investment accounts, and working capital;
(14) The tangible property of the homeowners association;
(15) A roster of current lot owners, including their mailing addresses,
telephone numbers, and lot numbers, if known;
(16) Individual member files and records, including assessment account
records, correspondence, and notices of any violations; and
(17) Drawings, architectural plans, or other suitable documents setting
forth the necessary information for location, maintenance, and repairs of all common areas.
[(e)] (F) The replacement reserves delivered under subsection [(d)(13)] (E)(13)
of this section shall be equal to at least the reserve funding amount recommended in the
reserve study completed under § 11B–112.3 of this title as of the date of the meeting.
[(f)] (G) (1) This subsection does not apply to a contract entered into before
October 1, 2009.
(2) (i) In this subsection, “contract” means an agreement with a
company or individual to handle financial matters, maintenance, or services for the
homeowners association.
(ii) “Contract” does not include an agreement relating to the
provision of utility services or communication systems.
(3) Until all members of the governing body are elected by the lot owners
at a transitional meeting under subsection [(a)] (B) of this section, a contract entered into
by the governing body may be terminated, at the discretion of the governing body and
without liability for the termination, not later than 30 days after notice.

HOUSE BILL 841 15
[(g)] (H) If the declarant fails to comply with the requirements of this section, an
aggrieved lot owner may submit the dispute to the Division of Consumer Protection of the
Office of the Attorney General under § 11B–115(c) of this title.
11B–111.
Except as provided in this title, and notwithstanding anything contained in any of
the documents of the homeowners association:
(1) Subject to the provisions of item [(4)] (5) of this section, all meetings of
the homeowners association, including meetings of the board of directors or other governing
body of the homeowners association or a committee of the homeowners association, shall
be open to all members of the homeowners association or their agents;
(2) All members of the homeowners association shall be given reasonable
notice of all regularly scheduled open meetings of the homeowners association;
(3) (i) This item does not apply to any meeting of a governing body that
occurs at any time before the lot owners, other than the developer, have a majority of votes
in the homeowners association, as provided in the declaration;
(ii) Subject to item (iii) of this item and to reasonable rules adopted
by [a] THE governing body, [a] THE governing body shall provide a designated period of
time during [a] EACH meeting to allow lot owners an opportunity to comment on any
matter relating to the homeowners association;
(iii) During a meeting at which the agenda is limited to specific topics
or at a special meeting, the lot owners’ comments may be limited to the topics listed on the
meeting agenda; and
(iv) The governing body shall convene at least one meeting each year
at which [the]:
1. THE agenda is open to any matter relating to the
homeowners association; AND
2. THE LOT OWNERS HAVE AN OPPORTUNITY TO
PROVIDE COMMENT;
(4) UNTIL THE LOT OWNERS, OTHER THAN THE DEVELOPER, HAVE A
MAJORITY OF VOTES IN THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION, AS PROVIDED IN THE
DECLARATION, THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OR THE DECLARANT SHALL CONVENE AT
LEAST ONE MEETING EACH YEAR AT WHICH:

HOUSE BILL 841
(I) THE AGENDA IS OPEN TO ANY MATTER RELATING TO THE
HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION; AND
(II) THE LOT OWNERS HAVE AN OPPORTUNITY TO PROVIDE
COMMENT;
[(4)] (5) A meeting of the board of directors or other governing body of the
homeowners association or a committee of the homeowners association may be held in
closed session only for the following purposes:
(i) Discussion of matters pertaining to employees and personnel;
(ii) Protection of the privacy or reputation of individuals in matters
not related to the homeowners association’s business;
(iii) Consultation with legal counsel on legal matters;
(iv) Consultation with staff personnel, consultants, attorneys, board
members, or other persons in connection with pending or potential litigation or other legal
matters;
(v) Investigative proceedings concerning possible or actual criminal
misconduct;
(vi) Consideration of the terms or conditions of a business
transaction in the negotiation stage if the disclosure could adversely affect the economic
interests of the homeowners association;
(vii) Compliance with a specific constitutional, statutory, or judicially
imposed requirement protecting particular proceedings or matters from public disclosure;
or
(viii) Discussion of individual owner assessment accounts;
[(5)] (6) If a meeting is held in closed session under item [(4)] (5) of this
section:
(i) An action may not be taken and a matter may not be discussed if
it is not permitted by item [(4)] (5) of this section; and
(ii) A statement of the time, place, and purpose of a closed meeting,
the record of the vote of each board or committee member by which the meeting was closed,
and the authority under this section for closing a meeting shall be included in the minutes
of the next meeting of the board of directors or the committee of the homeowners
association; and

HOUSE BILL 841 17
[(6)] (7) (i) If the number of lot owners present in person or by proxy
at a properly called meeting is insufficient to constitute a quorum, an additional meeting
of the lot owners may be called for the same purpose if:
1. The notice of the initial properly called meeting stated:
A. That the procedure authorized by this item [(6)] (7) might
be invoked; and
B. The date, time, and place of the additional meeting; and
2. A majority of the lot owners present vote in person or by
proxy to call for the additional meeting;
(ii) An additional meeting called under item (i) of this item shall
occur not less than 15 days after the initial properly called meeting;
(iii) 1. Not less than 10 days before the additional meeting, a
separate and distinct notice of the date, time, place, and purpose of the additional meeting
called under item (i) of this item shall be:
A. Delivered, mailed, or sent by electronic transmission, if
the requirements of § 11B–113.1 of this title are met, to each lot owner at the address shown
on the roster maintained by the homeowners association;
B. Advertised in a newspaper published in the county where
the homeowners association is located; or
C. If the homeowners association has a website, posted on the
homepage of the website; and
2. The notice shall contain the quorum and voting provisions
of item (iv) of this item;
(iv) 1. At the additional meeting, the lot owners present in
person or by proxy constitute a quorum; and
2. Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a majority of the lot
owners present in person or by proxy:
A. May approve or authorize the proposed action at the
additional meeting; and
B. May take any other action that could have been taken at
the original meeting if a sufficient number of lot owners had been present; and

HOUSE BILL 841
(v) This item [(6)] (7) may not be construed to affect the percentage
of votes required to amend the declaration or bylaws or to take any other action required
to be taken by a specified percentage of votes.
11B–111.6.
(d) A copy of the fidelity insurance policy or fidelity bond shall be included in the
books [and], records, AND ACCOUNTS kept and made available by or on behalf of the
homeowners association under § 11B–112 of this title.
11B–112.
(a) (1) (I) THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION SHALL MAINTAIN BOOKS
AND RECORDS BEGINNING ON THE DATE THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION IS
ESTABLISHED.
(II) ALL BOOKS AND RECORDS KEPT BY THE HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION SHALL BE MAINTAINED SEPARATE AND APART FROM THE BOOKS AND
RECORDS OF THE DECLARANT OR OF ANY OTHER PERSON.
[(1)] (2) (i) Subject to the provisions of paragraph [(2)] (3) of this
subsection, all books and records kept by or on behalf of the homeowners association shall
be made available for examination or copying, or both, by a lot owner, a lot owner’s
mortgagee, or their respective duly authorized agents or attorneys, during normal business
hours, and after reasonable notice.
(ii) Books and records required to be made available under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall first be made available to a lot owner no later than
15 business days after a lot is conveyed by the declarant and the lot owner requests to
examine or copy the books and records.
(iii) If a lot owner requests in writing a copy of financial statements
of the homeowners association or the minutes of a meeting of the governing body of the
homeowners association to be delivered, the governing body of the homeowners association
shall compile and send the requested information by mail, electronic transmission, or
personal delivery:
1. Within 21 days after receipt of the written request, if the
financial statements or minutes were prepared within the 3 years immediately preceding
receipt of the request; or
2. Within 45 days after receipt of the written request, if the
financial statements or minutes were prepared more than 3 years before receipt of the
request.

HOUSE BILL 841 19
[(2)] (3) Books and records kept by or on behalf of a homeowners
association may be withheld from public inspection, except for inspection by the person who
is the subject of the record or the person’s designee or guardian, to the extent that they
concern:
(i) Personnel records, not including information on individual
salaries, wages, bonuses, and other compensation paid to employees;
(ii) An individual’s medical records;
(iii) An individual’s personal financial records, including assets,
income, liabilities, net worth, bank balances, financial history or activities, and
creditworthiness;
(iv) Records relating to business transactions that are currently in
negotiation;
(v) The written advice of legal counsel; or
(vi) Minutes of a closed meeting of the governing body of the
homeowners association, unless a majority of a quorum of the governing body of the
homeowners association that held the meeting approves unsealing the minutes or a
recording of the minutes for public inspection.
(b) (2) A lot owner may not be charged for:
(i) Examining the financial statements of the homeowners
association in person where the financial statements are maintained in accordance with
subsection [(a)(1)(i)] (A)(2)(I) of this section, unless the financial statements are located in
a depository; or
(ii) Receiving the financial statements of the homeowners
association through electronic transmission in accordance with subsection [(a)(1)(iii)]
(A)(2)(III) of this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.